Maryland, session 2025, SB0472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
4–201.
(c) Except as otherwise provided by law, the collector shall remit the taxes
collected during any month, and interest, penalties, or service charges on the taxes
collected:
(1) for the county, to the appropriate county official on or before the 10th
day of the following month;
(2) for a municipal corporation, to the appropriate municipal corporation
official; and
(3) for a special district, to the appropriate officer of the district.
(D) FOR A PENALTY SET UNDER § 14–702(E) TAX REVENUE ATTRIBUTABLE
TO A SPECIAL RATE SET UNDER § 6–202.2 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE COLLECTOR SHALL
REMIT THE PENALTY TAX REVENUE COLLECTED DURING ANY MONTH AS FOLLOWS:
(1) 50% 5% TO THE TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 3–216 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; AND
(2) (I) FOR THE COUNTY, 50% 95% TO THE APPROPRIATE COUNTY
OFFICIAL ON OR BEFORE THE 10TH DAY OF THE FOLLOWING MONTH; AND
(II) FOR A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, 50% 95% TO THE
APPROPRIATE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION OFFICIAL.
6–202.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “RAIL STATION” MEANS A PRESENT OR
PLANNED PASSENGER RAIL STATION IN THE STATE.
(2) “RAIL STATION” INCLUDES A PRESENT OR PLANNED:

SENATE BILL 472 3
(I) MARC STATION ALONG THE PENN, CAMDEN, OR
BRUNSWICK LINES;
(II) BALTIMORE METRO SUBWAYLINK STATION;
(III) BALTIMORE LIGHT RAILLINK STATION; AND
(IV) METRORAIL SYSTEM STATION IN THE STATE, INCLUDING A
PURPLE LINE STATION.
(B) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY MAY ESTABLISH, BY LAW, A SUBCLASS OF REAL
PROPERTY CONSISTING OF THE FOLLOWING SUBCLASSES OF REAL PROPERTY:
(1) UNIMPROVED LAND THAT IS LOCATED WITHIN 1 MILE OF A RAIL
STATION; AND
(2) IMPROVEMENTS TO REAL PROPERTY LAND THAT IS LOCATED
WITHIN 1 MILE OF A RAIL STATION.
6–302.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section and after complying with § 6–305
of this subtitle, in each year after the date of finality and before the following July 1, the
Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of each county annually
shall set the tax rate for the next taxable year on all assessments of property subject to that
county’s property tax.
(b) (1) Except as provided in [subsection (c)] SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) of
this section and §§ 6–305 and 6–306 of this subtitle:
(i) there shall be a single county property tax rate for all real
property subject to county property tax except for operating real property described in §
8–109(c) of this article; and
(ii) the county tax rate applicable to personal property and the
operating real property described in § 8–109(c) of this article shall be no more than 2.5
times the rate for real property.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not affect a special rate prevailing
in a taxing district or part of a county.
(c) (1) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of
a county may set a special rate for a vacant lot or improved property cited as vacant and
unfit for habitation or other authorized use on a housing or building violation notice.

SENATE BILL 472
(2) On or before December 1 each year, the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore City or the governing body of a county that enacts a special rate under paragraph
(1) of this subsection shall report to the Department of Housing and Community
Development and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the
General Assembly on:
(i) the special rate set under paragraph (1) of this subsection;
(ii) the number of properties to which the special rate applies;
(iii) the revenue change resulting from the special rate;
(iv) the use of the revenue from the special rate; and
(v) whether properties subject to the special rate are viable for
adaptive reuse, as defined in § 1–102 of the Housing and Community Development Article,
and plans to convert viable properties.
(D) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “RAIL STATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 6–202.2 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE MAYOR
AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY
MAY SET A SPECIAL RATE FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO EACH SUBCLASS ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 6–202.2 OF THIS TITLE FOR REAL PROPERTY THAT IS LOCATED WITHIN 1
MILE OF A RAIL STATION.
(3) THE SPECIAL RATE SET UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE 0% OR GREATER THAN THE RATE SET UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION.
14–702.
(E) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “RAIL STATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 6–202.2 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE MAYOR
AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY
OR OF A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY SET, BY LAW, A TAX PENALTY AGAINST THE
COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION TOTAL TAX LIABILITY ON IMPROVEMENTS TO
REAL PROPERTY THAT IS LOCATED WITHIN 1 MILE OF A RAIL STATION FOR WHICH
THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION HAS SET A SPECIAL TAX RATE.

SENATE BILL 472 5
(3) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR OF A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION SHALL
ESTABLISH, BY LAW, CRITERIA FOR IMPOSING THE PENALTY AUTHORIZED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.